Hawaii statutes.
§302A-1159 Physical examination required.
(a) No child shall attend any school for the first time in the State unless
the child presents to the appropriate school official a report from a licensed
physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse of the
results of a physical examination performed within twelve months before the
date of attendance at school. A child may attend school provisionally upon
submitting written documentation from a licensed physician, physician
assistant, advanced practice registered nurse, or other authorized
representative of the department of health stating that the child is in the
process of undergoing a physical examination. Further documentation showing
that the required physical examination has been completed shall be submitted to
the appropriate school official no later than three months after the child
first attends the school.

(b) Beginning with the 2017-2018 school year,
every child entering seventh grade shall present to the appropriate school official
written documentation from a licensed physician, physician assistant, or
advanced practice registered nurse showing completion of a physical examination
performed within twelve months before the date of attendance. The department
shall send notification of the physical examination requirement to the child's
parents or guardians, upon the child's entrance into sixth grade, and post the
requirement on the department's website. By December 31 of each year, the
department shall provide to the department of health a list of students
attending seventh grade who have not submitted appropriate written
documentation, along with directory information as allowed under the federal
Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act. [L 1996, c 89, pt of §2; am L 1998, c
60, §4; am L 2000, c 109, §3; am L 2014, c 16, §5 and c 232, §13; am L 2016, c
185, §2]

Cross References

Department of education student physical examination
follow-up assistance and consultations, see §321-35.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next